Georgia, session 2025_26, HB898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 898
- 1 -

25 LC 57 9001
16 SECTION 1.
17 Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public assistance,
18 is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
19 "ARTICLE 10
20 49-4-200.
21 This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Continuing Insulin Safety Net Act.'
22 49-4-201.
23 As used in this article, the term:
24 (1) 'Alternative plan' means an alternative plan established by the manufacturer as
25 provided for in Code Section 49-4-202.
26 (2) 'Department' means the Department of Community Health.
27 (3) 'Eligible individual' means an individual qualified for assistance under the program
28 as provided for in Code Section 49-4-203.
29 (4) 'Insulin' means various types of insulin analogs and insulin-like medications,
30 regardless of activation period or whether the solution is mixed before or after
31 dispensation. An insulin product is exempt from the provisions of this article if the
32 wholesale acquisition cost of the insulin is $8.00 or less per milliliter or applicable
33 National Council for Prescription Drug Plan billing unit, for the entire assessment time
34 period, adjusted annually based on the Consumer Price Index.
35 (5) 'Manufacturer' means a manufacturer engaged in the production of insulin that is
36 self-administered on an outpatient basis. Such term shall not include a manufacturer with
37 an annual gross revenue of $2 million or less from insulin sales in this state.
38 (6) 'Pharmacy' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 26-4-5.
H. B. 898
- 2 -

25 LC 57 9001
39 (7) 'Program' means the patient assistance program established by each manufacturer as
40 provided for in Code Section 49-4-202.
41 (8) 'Proper identification' means any document issued by a governmental agency
42 containing a description of the individual, such individual's photograph, or both, and
43 giving such individual's date of birth, and includes, without being limited to, a passport,
44 military identification card, driver's license, or identification card authorized under Code
45 Sections 40-5-100 through 40-5-104. Proper identification shall not include a birth
46 certificate.
47 49-4-202.
48 (a) Each manufacturer shall make a patient assistance program that:
49 (1) Is made available to eligible individuals;
50 (2) Provides a 90 day supply of insulin at no charge to an eligible individual or pharmacy
51 and can be reordered for up to one year; and
52 (3) Is renewable annually if an individual still meets eligibility requirements.
53 (b) To ensure that insulin is affordable and accessible to Georgia residents in need of
54 insulin each manufacturer shall, in addition to the program, establish at least one alternative
55 plan, such as a cost-sharing assistance plan or a mechanism for providing an emergency
56 or urgent supply of insulin.
57 (c) Each manufacturer shall:
58 (1) Provide information about its program and any alternative plans to the department;
59 (2) Post information and a hotline for the program and any alternative plans on its
60 website; and
61 (3) Provide for dedicated personnel to promptly respond to individuals, pharmacies,
62 healthcare providers, and the department regarding the program and any alternative plans.
H. B. 898
- 3 -

25 LC 57 9001
63 49-4-203.
64 (a) To be deemed eligible to participate in a manufacturer's program, an individual shall:
65 (1) Provide proper identification that indicates the individual is a resident of this state.
66 If the individual is under the age of 18, such individual's parent or legal guardian shall
67 provide proper identification that indicates residency of this state;
68 (2) Have a family income that is equal to or less than 400 percent of the federal poverty
69 guidelines;
70 (3) Not be enrolled in medical assistance;
71 (4) Not be eligible to receive healthcare through a federally funded program or receive
72 prescription drug benefits through the Department of Veteran Affairs; provided, however,
73 that an individual who is enrolled in Medicare Part D is eligible for a manufacturer's
74 patient assistance program if such individual has spent $1,000.00 or more on prescription
75 drugs in the current calendar year; and
76 (5) Not be enrolled in prescription drug coverage through an individual or group health
77 plan that limits the total amount of cost-sharing for a 90 day supply of insulin, including
78 co-payments, deductibles, or coinsurance to $75.00 or less, regardless of the type or
79 amount of insulin needed.
80 (b) An individual shall apply directly to the manufacturer to participate in the program.
81 Upon receipt of an application for the program, the manufacturer shall process the
82 application and determine eligibility of the individual. The manufacturer shall notify the
83 applicant within ten business days of receipt of the application. When additional
84 information is required, the manufacturer shall notify the applicant within five business
85 days of receipt of the application as to what additional information is required. Within
86 three business days of receipt of the requested additional information, the manufacturer
87 shall determine eligibility of the individual and shall notify the applicant of such
88 determination.
H. B. 898
- 4 -

25 LC 57 9001
89 (c) When the individual is determined to be eligible, the manufacturer shall provide such
90 individual with an eligibility statement. An individual's eligibility is valid for twelve
91 months and is renewable upon a redetermination of eligibility.
92 (d) When the individual is determined to be ineligible, the manufacturer shall include in
93 its notification the reasons for such determination. The individual may appeal the
94 determination as provided for in Code Section 49-4-205.
95 (e) The manufacturer shall provide to any applicant deemed ineligible information about
96 any alternative plans available to such individual.
97 49-4-204.
98 (a) An eligible individual shall submit to a pharmacy the eligibility statement provided by
99 the manufacturer.
100 (b) Upon receipt of an individual's eligibility statement, the pharmacy shall submit an
101 order containing the name of the insulin product and the daily dosage amount as contained
102 in a valid prescription to the product's manufacturer. The pharmacy shall include with the
103 order to the manufacturer the pharmacy's name and shipping address, necessary contact
104 information, and any specific days or times when deliveries are not accepted by such
105 pharmacy.
106 (c) Upon receipt of an order and necessary information as provided for in subsection (b)
107 of this Code section, the manufacturer shall send to the pharmacy a 90 day supply of
108 insulin as ordered, unless a lesser amount is requested in the order, at no charge to the
109 individual or pharmacy.
110 (d) Except as authorized under subsection (e) of this Code section, the pharmacy shall
111 provide the insulin to the individual at no charge to such individual. The pharmacy shall
112 not provide insulin received from the manufacturer to any individual other than the
113 individual associated with the specific order. The pharmacy shall not seek reimbursement
114 for the insulin received from the manufacturer or from any third-party payer.
H. B. 898
- 5 -

25 LC 57 9001
115 (e) The pharmacy may collect a co-payment from the individual to cover the pharmacy's
116 costs for processing and dispensing the insulin in an amount not to exceed $50.00 for each
117 90 day supply of insulin sent to and dispensed from the pharmacy for an order or for a
118 reorder.
119 (f) The pharmacy may submit to a manufacturer a reorder for an individual if such
120 individual's eligibility has not expired. Upon receipt of a reorder from a pharmacy, the
121 manufacturer shall send to the pharmacy an additional 90 day supply of insulin, unless a
122 lesser amount is requested, at no charge to the individual or the pharmacy.
123 (g) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this Code section, a manufacturer may send the
124 insulin as ordered directly to the individual if the manufacturer provides a mail order
125 service option.
126 49-4-205.
127 (a) When an individual disagrees with a manufacturer's determination of ineligibility, such
128 individual may contact the department to request a review of such determination. Such
129 review shall be completed by a panel composed of three members of the department. The
130 individual requesting the review shall submit to the department with the request for review
131 all documents submitted by the individual to the manufacturer, which the department shall
132 provide to the panel. The panel shall render a decision within ten business days of receipt
133 of all the necessary documents from the individual. The decision of the panel shall be
134 final.
135 (b) If the panel determines that the individual is eligible, the manufacturer shall provide
136 the individual with an eligibility statement.
137 49-4-206.
138 (a) The department, in coordination with the manufacturer, shall develop an information
139 sheet that shall include, but shall not be limited to:
H. B. 898
- 6 -

25 LC 57 9001
140 (1) A description of the program, including how to access it and information about any
141 alternative plans;
142 (2) Information on applying for medical assistance;
143 (3) Information on applying for a qualified health plan offered through the exchange as
144 defined in Code Section 33-23-201; and
145 (4) Information on accessing healthcare providers who participate in prescription drug
146 discount programs, including providers who are authorized to participate in the 340B
147 program under section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C.
148 Section 256b, as amended.
149 (b) The department shall post the information sheet provided for in subsection (a) of this
150 Code section on its website.
151 49-4-207.
152 (a) The department, in coordination with the manufacturer, shall develop a survey to assess
153 an eligible individual's satisfaction with the program and any alternative plans, including:
154 (1) Adequacy of information available and provided to individuals;
155 (2) Accessibility to insulin; and
156 (3) Individual's ability to access affordable insulin.
157 (b) The department, in coordination with the manufacturer, shall develop a survey to
158 assess a pharmacy's satisfaction with the program and alternative plans, including:
159 (1) Ease in submitting claims and insulin product orders to the manufacturers; and
160 (2) Timeliness of receiving insulin reorders or renewal orders from the manufacturers.
161 (c) The department shall post the surveys provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this
162 Code section on its website.
H. B. 898
- 7 -

25 LC 57 9001
163 49-4-208.
164 (a) Any data collected, created, received, maintained, or disseminated by the department
165 pursuant to this article related to an individual seeking access to the program or any
166 alternative plans shall be kept confidential and shall be retained for no longer than ten
167 years.
168 (b) Each pharmacy and manufacturer shall maintain the privacy of all data received from
169 any individual applying for the manufacturer's program or any alternative plans and shall
170 be prohibited from selling, sharing, or disseminating such data received unless required to
171 do so under this article or when an individual has provided the manufacturer with signed
172 authorization.
173 49-4-209.
174 (a) Any person who by means of a false statement, failure to disclose information, or
175 impersonation, or by other fraudulent device, obtains, attempts to obtain, or retains for
176 himself, herself, or any other person any medical assistance or other benefit or payment
177 under this article to which such person is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to
178 which such person is entitled shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. If the total amount of the
179 value of the assistance so obtained exceeds $1,500.00, such person shall be guilty of a
180 felony.
181 (b)(1) If a manufacturer fails to comply with the provisions of this article, the department
182 may assess an administrative penalty of $200,000.00 per month of such noncompliance.
183 (2) Such penalty shall increase to $400,000.00 per month if the manufacturer continues
184 to be in noncompliance after six months and shall increase to $600,000.00 per month if
185 the manufacturer continues to be in noncompliance after one year.
186 (3) The penalty shall remain at $600,000.00 per month for as long as the manufacturer
187 continues in noncompliance.
H. B. 898
- 8 -

25 LC 57 9001
188 (c) An individual or entity that is aggrieved by the action of the department pursuant to
189 subsections (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be entitled to a hearing conducted in
190 accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.'
191 49-4-210.
192 (a) By July 1, 2026, and every July 1 thereafter, each manufacturer shall report to the
193 department the following information for the preceding calendar year:
194 (1) A description of the program and any changes made to the program;
195 (2) The number of Georgia residents who accessed and received insulin through the
196 program;
197 (3) The total value of the insulin, determined by the wholesale acquisition cost of the
198 insulin, provided by the manufacturer through the program;
199 (4) A description of the alternative plans and any changes made to them;
200 (5) The number of Georgia residents who accessed and received insulin through the
201 alternative plans;
202 (6) The total value of the insulin, determined by the wholesale acquisition cost of the
203 insulin, provided by the manufacturer through the alternative plans;
204 (7) The number of individuals deemed ineligible for the program or the alternative plans
205 and the reasons for their ineligibility;
206 (8) The number of appeals and the number of eligibility statuses that were sustained or
207 reversed;
208 (9) The timeliness and adequacy of the manufacturers in responding to individuals
209 applying for the program or the alternative plans and pharmacies requesting insulin
210 through the program or the alternative plans;
211 (10) Any administrative penalties assessed under Code Section 49-4-209; and
212 (11) Any additional information deemed necessary by the department.
H. B. 898
- 9 -

25 LC 57 9001
213 (b) By July 1, 2026, and every July 1 thereafter, a pharmacy that received any eligibility
214 statements from individuals for the program or the alternative plans shall report to the
215 department the following information for the preceding calendar year:
216 (1) The number of eligibility statements received;
217 (2) The amount of insulin dispensed through the program;
218 (3) The average and total amount of copayment collected from individuals;
219 (4) The timeliness and adequacy of manufacturers' responses; and
220 (5) Any additional information deemed necessary by the department.
221 (b) By August 15, 2027, and every August 15 thereafter, the department shall submit to
222 the General Assembly a report regarding the implementation of the program under this
223 article. Such report shall include the following information for the preceding year:
224 (1) The data collected under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section;
225 (2) The results of the satisfaction surveys provided for in Code Section 49-4-207; and
226 (3) Any additional information deemed necessary by the department to assess the
227 implementation and effectiveness of the program."
228 SECTION 2.
229 This Act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
230 SECTION 3.
231 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 898
- 10 -